West Virginia, session 2026, HB5182.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8A. UNCLAIMED STOLEN PROPERTY HELD BY LAW-ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES. §36-8A-8. State Treasurer’s security personnel authority to carry concealed weapons.(a) The State Treasurer may allow, consistent with the provisions of this section, security personnel to carry a concealed firearm while performing his or her official duties.(b) Security personnel employed by the State Treasurer may carry a concealed firearm approved by the State Treasurer solely for purposes of defense of self or others if the individual has:(1) Obtained the written authorization by the State Treasurer;(2) Been determined not to be prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or federal law;(3) Obtained and maintains a concealed handgun license pursuant to §61-7-1 et seq. of this code; and(4) Successfully completed a firearms training and certification program equivalent to that provided to officers attending the entry level law-enforcement certification course provided at the West Virginia State Police Academy pursuant to §30-29-1 et seq. of this code. The individual must thereafter successfully complete an annual firearms qualification equivalent to that required of certified law-enforcement officers pursuant to §30-29-1 et seq. of this code. The State Treasurer may reimburse security personnel for the cost of the training and requalification. (c) Neither the state, a political subdivision, an agency nor an employee of the state acting in an official capacity, may be held personally liable for an act of security personnel employed by the State Treasurer if the act or omission was done in good faith while the individual was performing official duties or responsibilities under the office of the State Treasurer.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home